Washington statutes.
RCW 21.35.020

Registering a security in beneficiary form—Designation of beneficiary.

A security, whether evidenced by certificate or account, is registered in beneficiary form when the registration includes a designation of a beneficiary to take the ownership at the death of a sole owner or at the death of the last to die of multiple owners.

[ 1993 c 287 s 4.]